Vermont, session 2025-2026, H428.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 14 V.S.A. § 3071 is amended to read:
§ 3071. DUTIES OF GUARDIAN
(a) The guardian shall maintain close contact with the person under
guardianship and encourage maximum self-reliance on the part of the person
under guardianship.
(b) In addition to the powers vested in the guardian by the court pursuant to
section 3069 of this title, the court may order the guardian to assure ensure that
the person under guardianship receives those benefits and services to which he
or she the person is lawfully entitled and needs to maximize his or her the
VT LEG #380261 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.428
2025 Page 2 of 3
person’s opportunity for social and financial independence. Those benefits and
services include, but are not limited to:
(1) education services for a person under guardianship who is of school
age;
(2) residential services for a person under guardianship who lacks
adequate housing;
(3) nutrition services;
(4) medical and dental services, including home health care;
(5) therapeutic and habilitative services, adult education, vocational
rehabilitation, or other appropriate services.
(c) The guardian shall always serve the interests of the person under
guardianship and shall bring any potential conflicts of interest to the attention
of the court.
(d)(1) When the court appoints a guardian for an adult with disabilities, the
court shall ensure that the guardian understands the powers and duties of
guardianship and complies with the following requirements of a mandatory
training program jointly established by the Probate Division of the Superior
Court and the Department of Disabilities, Aging, and Independent Living:
(A) The training shall include a review of a guardianship handbook
approved by the Probate Division of the Superior Court and the Department of
Disabilities, Aging and Independent Living.
VT LEG #380261 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.428
2025 Page 3 of 3
(B) The training shall be specific to the constitutional and statutory
rights of the person under guardianship, including rights afforded to the person
under guardianship by the U.S. and Vermont Constitutions and by section
3068a of this title.
(C) The training shall include definitions of civil rights and how they
apply to adults with disabilities.
(2) The proposed guardian shall attend the training program established
pursuant to this subsection prior to the commencement of the guardianship and
every three years thereafter while the guardianship remains in effect.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on September 1, 2025.
VT LEG #380261 v.1